Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-241.07
Advertising; limitations; exception.

Only a licensed organization or a qualifying nonprofit organization may advertise a bingo occasion, a limited period bingo, or a special event bingo. No advertising for any bingo occasion or occasions conducted by any organization shall include any reference to an aggregate value of bingo prizes exceeding four thousand dollars.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 44.